RHVoice/src/scripts/Spanish/sl_phone_mapping.foma
# Copyright (C) 2025  Mateo Cedillo <angelitomateocedillo@gmail.com>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.


define Mapping 
aa -> a ,, 
aa0 -> a ,, 
aa1 -> a1 ,, 
ae -> e ,, 
ae0 -> e ,, 
ae1 -> e1 ,, 
ah -> a ,, 
ah0 -> a ,, 
ah1 -> a1 ,, 
ao -> o ,, 
ao0 -> o ,, 
ao1 -> o1 ,, 
aw -> a u ,, 
aw0 -> a u ,, 
aw1 -> a1 u ,, 
ax -> e ,, 
ax0 -> e ,, 
ax1 -> e1 ,, 
ay -> a j ,, 
ay0 -> a j ,, 
ay1 -> a1 j ,, 
eh -> e ,, 
eh0 -> e ,, 
eh1 -> e1 ,, 
er -> e r ,, 
er0 -> e r ,, 
er1 -> e1 r ,, 
ey -> e i ,, 
ey0 -> e i ,, 
ey1 -> e1 i ,, 
ih -> i ,, 
ih0 -> i ,, 
ih1 -> i1 ,, 
iy -> i ,, 
iy0 -> i ,, 
iy1 -> i1 ,, 
ow -> o u ,, 
ow0 -> o u ,, 
ow1 -> o1 u ,, 
oy -> o i ,, 
oy0 -> o i ,, 
oy1 -> o1 i ,, 
uh -> u ,, 
uh0 -> u ,, 
uh1 -> u1 ,, 
uw -> u ,, 
uw0 -> u ,, 
uw1 -> u1 ,, 
b -> b ,, 
ch -> ts ,, 
d -> d ,, 
dh -> d ,, 
f -> f ,, 
g -> g ,, 
hh -> x ,, 
jh -> ll ,, 
k -> k ,, 
l -> l ,, 
m -> m ,, 
n -> n ,, 
ng -> n ,, 
p -> p ,, 
r -> r ,, 
s -> s ,, 
sh -> sh ,, 
t -> t ,, 
th -> c ,, 
v -> v ,, 
w -> w ,, 
y -> i ,, 
z -> zh ,, 
zh -> sh ; 

regex 
Mapping ;
